Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Security Agreements

§ 2071.
Penalty for failure to discharge security agreement.

When the condition of a security agreement has been fulfilled, within 30 days thereafter, the secured party shall cause the security agreement to be discharged of record.
A person who neglects or refuses so to do shall be fined not more than $50.00 nor less than $5.00.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2072.
Removal of collateral from the State.

No person may, with intent to defraud or to deprive a secured party or debtor of his or her legal rights or remedies, remove collateral from the State, or conceal or aid in concealing it.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 20.

§ 2073.
Sale of collateral.

A debtor shall not sell, pledge, or exchange collateral without the consent of the secured party in writing recorded in the office where the security agreement is recorded or upon the back of the security agreement, and, in either case, on the margin of the record thereof in the office where it is recorded.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 21.

§ 2074.
Prior security interest to be set forth in subsequent security agreement.

A debtor shall not execute a second or subsequent security agreement covering collateral that is the subject of a previously existing security agreement made by the debtor unless the existence of the previous security agreement is set forth in the subsequent security agreement.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 22.

§ 2075.
Penalties.

A person who violates section 2072, 2073, or 2074 of this title shall be fined not more than double the value of the collateral so wrongfully removed from the State, sold, concealed, pledged, mortgaged, or exchanged, and half the fine shall be paid to the party injured.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2076.
Statutory construction.

Statutes using the words “pledge,” “mortgage,” “conditional sale,” “lien,” “assignment,” and like terms in referring to a security interest in personal property shall also apply to a corresponding type of security interest under 9A V.S.A. §§ 1—101 et seq. and sections 2051-2057, 2061-2066, 2071-2076 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 24.